Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Licensing and Regulation.

Sec. 08.20.100.
Practice of chiropractic.

A person may not practice chiropractic or use chiropractic core methodology in the state without a license.

A person licensed under this chapter may

analyze, diagnose, or treat the chiropractic condition of a patient by chiropractic core methodology or by ancillary methodology;

accept referrals for treatment by chiropractic core methodology or by ancillary methodology;

consult on chiropractic matters;

refer patients to other health care professionals;

perform, within the scope of chiropractic practice, physical examinations of children for school physical examinations and preparticipation physical examinations for sports and school activities;

sign

reports for excuses from employment and from attendance at school or participation in sports activities; and

authorizations for sick leave;

perform preemployment and workplace health examinations;

provide disability and physical impairment ratings;

provide retirement health and disability authorizations and recommendations;

employ nationally certified chiropractic clinical assistants; and

employ chiropractic interns and chiropractic preceptors.

A person licensed under this chapter is not authorized to sign affidavits exempting school children from immunization requirements under AS

14.30.125

or to administer or interpret the results of infectious disease tests required by statute or regulation.

This section does not apply to a chiropractic intern who is acting within the scope of practice authorized by the board and is under the personal supervision of a licensed chiropractor.

History.

(§ 35-3-21 ACLA 1949; am §§ 3, 4 ch 60 SLA 1988; am §§ 2, 3 ch 8 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective August 15, 2016, in (b)(2), deleted “chiropractic” following “accept referrals for” and added “by chiropractic core methodology or by ancillary methodology” following “treatment”; in (b)(5), substituted “perform” for “sign (a)” at the beginning of the paragraph, deleted “certificates of” following “chiropractic practice,” and substituted “for school physical examinations and preparticipation physical examinations for sports and school activities” for “before they enter school”; in (b)(6), inserted “sign” at the beginning of the paragraph and redesignated former (5)(B) and (C) as (6)(A) and (B); redesignated the following paragraphs of (b) accordingly; added (b)(10-11); added (d); and made related and stylistic changes.

Sec. 08.20.110.
Application for license.

A person desiring to practice chiropractic shall apply in writing to the board.

History.

(§ 35-3-26 ACLA 1949)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 16, art. 2.

Sec. 08.20.115.
Malpractice insurance. [Repealed, § 40 ch 177 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 08.20.120.
Qualifications for license.

An applicant shall be issued a license to practice chiropractic if the applicant

has a high school education or its equivalent;

has successfully completed at least two academic years of study in a college of liberal arts or sciences or has engaged in the active licensed practice of chiropractic for three of the four years preceding the filing of the application;

is a graduate of a school or college of chiropractic that

is accredited by or a candidate for accreditation by the Council on Chiropractic Education or a successor accrediting agency recognized by the board; or

if an accrediting agency under (A) of this paragraph does not exist, requires the completion of a minimum of 4,000 hours of formal education and training in order to graduate, including

150 hours of chiropractic philosophy or principles;

1200 hours of basic sciences, including anatomy, chemistry, physiology, and pathology;

1400 hours of preclinical technique, including diagnosis, chiropractic technique, and x-rays; and

700 hours of clinical training;

completes 120 hours of formal training in physiological therapeutics;

passes an examination given by the board; and

passes, to the satisfaction of the board, the parts of the examination of the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners required by the board.

[Repealed § 2 ch 93 SLA 1996.]

History.

(§ 35-3-25 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 53 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 91 SLA 1965; am § 25 ch 245 SLA 1970; am § 8 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 84 SLA 1972; am §§ 5, 6 ch 162 SLA 1980; am §§ 5, 6 ch 60 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 93 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 16, art. 2.

For continuing education, see 12 AAC 16, art. 3.

Sec. 08.20.130.
Examinations.

Examinations for a license to practice chiropractic may be held in the time and manner fixed by the board.

The examination may include practical demonstration and oral and written examination in those subjects usually taught in accredited chiropractic schools.

A general average rating of 75 percent is a passing grade on the examination.

An applicant may take a reexamination within one year after failing the examination.

History.

(§ 35-3-27 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 91 SLA 1965; am § 13 ch 37 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For the board, see 12 AAC 16, art. 1.

For licensing, see 12 AAC 16, art. 2.

Sec. 08.20.135.
Associate. [Repealed, § 13 ch 162 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 08.20.140.
Licensure by credentials. [Repealed, § 2 ch 93 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 08.20.141.
Licensure by credentials.

The board may issue a license by credentials to an applicant who pays the appropriate fee and presents satisfactory proof that the applicant

is a graduate of a school or college of chiropractic that

is accredited by or a candidate for accreditation by the Council on Chiropractic Education or a successor accrediting agency recognized by the board; or

if an accrediting agency under (A) of this paragraph does not exist, requires the completion of a minimum of 4,000 hours of formal education and training in order to graduate, including

150 hours of chiropractic philosophy or principles;

1,200 hours of basic sciences, including anatomy, chemistry, physiology, and pathology;

1,400 hours of preclinical technique, including diagnosis, chiropractic technique, and x-rays; and

700 hours of clinical training;

has held a license in good standing to practice chiropractic in another jurisdiction for the five years preceding the date of application; for purposes of this paragraph, “good standing” means that

no action has been reported about the applicant in the national licensee database of the Federation of Chiropractic Licensing Boards;

the applicant has not, within the five years preceding the date of application, been the subject of an unresolved review or an adverse decision based on a complaint, investigation, review procedure, or disciplinary proceeding undertaken by a foreign, state, territorial, local, or federal chiropractic licensing jurisdiction, chiropractic society, or law enforcement agency that relates to criminal or fraudulent activity, chiropractic malpractice, or negligent chiropractic care and that adversely reflects on the applicant’s ability or competence to engage in the practice of chiropractic or on the safety or well-being of patients; and

the applicant has not been convicted of a felony within the five years preceding the date of application;

has been in active licensed clinical chiropractic practice for at least three of the five years immediately preceding the date of application;

has passed, to the satisfaction of the board, the parts of the examination of the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners required by the board;

has passed an examination approved by the board that is designed to test the applicant’s knowledge of the laws of the state governing the practice of chiropractic and the regulations adopted under those laws; and

has completed 120 hours of formal training in physiological therapeutics or has passed, to the satisfaction of the board, a physiological therapeutics examination of the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners required by the board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 39 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 16, art. 2.

Sec. 08.20.150.
Recording of license. [Repealed, § 7 ch 37 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 08.20.155.
Professional designation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

08.02.010

relating to specialist designations, a person licensed under this chapter may not designate a specialty unless the person has completed a postgraduate specialty program at an accredited school approved by the board and the person has passed a certification exam for the specialty approved by the board. All specialty designations must include the term “chiropractic.”

History.

(§ 7 ch 60 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 16, art. 2.

Sec. 08.20.160.
Temporary permits.

Temporary permits may be issued to qualified applicants until the next regular meeting of the board.

History.

(§ 35-3-28 ACLA 1949; am § 4 ch 8 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 16, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective August 15, 2016, deleted “persons apparently” preceding “qualified” and inserted “applicants” following “qualified”.

Sec. 08.20.163.
Temporary permit for locum tenens practice.

The board may grant a temporary permit to a chiropractor for the purpose of the chiropractor’s substituting for another chiropractor licensed in this state. The permit is valid for 60 consecutive days. If circumstances warrant, an extension of the permit may be granted by the board.

A chiropractor applying under (a) of this section shall pay the required fee and shall meet the

requirements of AS

08.20.120

; or

following requirements:

submit evidence of a current license in good standing, including

no action reported in the national licensee database of the Federation of Chiropractic Licensing Boards;

not having been, within the five years preceding the date of application, the subject of an unresolved review or an adverse decision based upon a complaint, investigation, review procedure, or disciplinary proceeding undertaken by a state, territorial, local, or federal chiropractic licensing jurisdiction, chiropractic society, or law enforcement agency that relates to criminal or fraudulent activity, chiropractic malpractice, or negligent chiropractic care and that adversely reflects on the applicant’s ability or competence to engage in the practice of chiropractic or on the safety or well-being of patients; and

no conviction for a felony within the five years preceding the date of application;

submit evidence of five years of active licensed clinical practice;

be a graduate of a school or college of chiropractic that is accredited by or a candidate for accreditation by the Council on Chiropractic Education or a successor accrediting agency recognized by the board;

have completed 120 hours of formal training in physiological therapeutics or have passed, to the satisfaction of the board, a physiological therapeutic examination of the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners required by the board;

have passed, to the satisfaction of the board, Parts I and II of the examination of the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners; and

pass an examination given by the board.

Permits and extensions of permits issued under this section to an individual are not valid for more than 240 days during any consecutive 24 months.

History.

(§ 1 ch 35 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For temporary courtesy licenses, see AS

08.01.062

.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 16, art. 2.

Sec. 08.20.165.
Inactive license status.

A licensee who does not practice in the state may convert a license to inactive status when renewing the license. A person who practices in the state, however infrequently, shall hold an active license. A person renewing an inactive license shall meet the same renewal requirements that would be applicable if the person were renewing an active license.

A person who has an inactive license certificate under (a) of this section may reactivate the license by applying for an active license and paying the required fees.

History.

(§ 1 ch 35 SLA 2000)

Sec. 08.20.167.
Retired license status.

Upon retiring from practice and upon payment of an appropriate one-time fee, a licensee in good standing with the board may apply for the conversion of an active or inactive license to a retired status license. A person holding a retired status license may not practice chiropractic in the state. A retired status license is valid for the life of the license holder and does not require renewal. A person holding a retired status license is exempt from continuing education requirements adopted by the board under AS

08.20.170(d)

.

A person with a retired status license may apply for active licensure. Before issuing an active license under this subsection, the board may require the applicant to meet reasonable criteria, as determined under regulations of the board, that may include submission of continuing education credits, reexamination requirements, physical and psychiatric examination requirements, an interview with the board, and a review of information in the national licensee database of the Federation of Chiropractic Licensing Boards.

History.

(§ 1 ch 35 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For continuing education, see 12 AAC 16, art. 3.

Sec. 08.20.168.
Chiropractic clinical assistant.

Enrollment in or completion of a nationally recognized certification program under AS

08.20.055

(4) is required to practice as a chiropractic clinical assistant in this state.

A person who meets the requirement under (a) of this section may, under the general supervision of a person licensed under this chapter,

perform diagnostic imaging studies;

use ancillary methodologies; and

perform procedures.

History.

(§ 5 ch 8 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 56, SLA 2016 makes this chapter effective November 4, 2016.

Sec. 08.20.170.
Disciplinary sanctions; refusal to issue or renew license.

The board may impose a disciplinary sanction on a person licensed under this chapter or refuse to issue a license under this chapter when the board finds that the person

secured or attempted to secure a license through deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation;

engaged in deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation in the course of providing professional services or engaging in professional activities;

advertised professional services in a false or misleading manner;

has been convicted, including a conviction based on a guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere, of

a felony or other crime that affects the person’s ability to practice competently and safely; or

a crime involving the unlawful procurement, sale, prescription, or dispensing of drugs;

intentionally or negligently engaged in or permitted the performance of patient care by persons under the licensee’s supervision that does not conform to minimum professional standards established by regulation regardless of whether actual injury to the patient occurred;

failed to comply with this chapter, with a regulation adopted under this chapter, or with an order of the board;

continued or attempted to practice after becoming unfit due to

professional incompetence;

addiction or severe dependency on alcohol or a drug that impairs the person’s ability to practice safely;

physical or mental disability or an infectious or contagious disease;

engaged in lewd or immoral conduct in connection with the delivery of professional service to patients; or

failed to satisfy continuing education requirements adopted by the board.

AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to any action taken by the board for the suspension or revocation of a license.

A person whose license is suspended or revoked may within two years from date of suspension apply for reinstatement, and if the board is satisfied that the applicant should be reinstated, it shall order reinstatement.

The board shall adopt regulations that ensure that renewal of license is contingent on proof of continued competency by a practitioner.

History.

(§ 35-3-29 ACLA 1949; am § 25 ch 177 SLA 1978; am §§ 9, 10 ch 162 SLA 1980; am § 8 ch 60 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 35 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For disciplinary powers of board, see AS

08.01.075

.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 12 AAC 16, art. 2.

For continuing education, see 12 AAC 16, art. 3.

Collateral references. —

Cancellation or suspension irrespective of licensee’s personal fault, validity of statute or rule making specified conduct or condition the ground for, 3 ALR2d 107.

Plea of nolo contendere or non vult contendere,
89 A.L.R.2d 540.

Sec. 08.20.175.
Disciplinary sanctions. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.075.]

Sec. 08.20.180.
Fees.

An applicant for an examination, reexamination, issuance of a temporary permit under AS

08.20.160

, issuance of a locum tenens permit under AS

08.20.163

, issuance of a license by credentials under AS

08.20.141

, one-time issuance of a retired status license, or initial issuance or renewal of an active or inactive license shall pay a fee established under AS

08.01.065

.

[Repealed, § 24 ch 22 SLA 2001.]

History.

(§ 35-3-30 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 1968; am § 12 ch 162 SLA 1980; am § 14 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 35 SLA 2000; am § 24 ch 22 SLA 2001; am § 3 ch 39 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 08.20.185.
Utilization review committee; confidentiality.

The board may establish a utilization review committee to review complaints concerning the reasonableness or appropriateness of care provided, fees charged, or costs for services rendered by a licensee to a patient. A review conducted by a utilization review committee under this section may be used by the board in considering disciplinary action against a licensee, but the results or recommendations of a utilization review committee are not binding on the board. A member of a utilization review committee established under this section who in good faith submits a report under this section or participates in an investigation or judicial proceeding related to a report submitted under this section is immune from civil liability for the submission or participation.

The board shall charge a complainant a fee, established under AS

08.01.065

, for utilization review under this section.

Patient records presented to a utilization review committee for review under this section that were confidential before their presentation to the committee are confidential to the committee members and to the board members and are not subject to inspection or copying under AS

40.25.110

-

40.25.125

. A committee member or board member to whom confidential records are presented under this subsection shall maintain the confidentiality of the records. A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 112 SLA 1992; am §§ 1, 2 ch 101 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 8 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.125

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.125” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.125.

Cross references. —

For sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For peer review, see 12 AAC 16, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective August 15, 2016, in (a), substituted “the” for “in addition to peer review authorized under AS

08.01.075

, the”; substituted “utilization” for “peer” in four places, substituted “used” for “utilized”, and made related stylistic changes; in (b) and (c), substituted “utilization” for “peer”.

Sec. 08.20.190.
Disposition of fees. [Repealed, § 54 ch 37 SLA 1985.]

Sec. 08.20.195.
Limitation of practice.

A person licensed under this chapter or a person who is practicing as a chiropractic intern, chiropractic clinical assistant, or chiropractic preceptor under this chapter may act only within the scope of practice authorized by the board.

History.

(§ 7 ch 8 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 7, ch. 8, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effective August 15, 2016.